JP Energy Partners LP: NYSE:JPEP quotes & news - Google FinanceCookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookiesLearn moreGot itMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceJP Energy Partners LP(NYSE:JPEP)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




JP Energy Partners LP  (Public, NYSE:JPEP)  
Watch this stock
 




















0.0000









- Close


NYSE
real-time data -
Disclaimer

Currency in USD







Range

    -



52 week

4.63 - 10.58



Open

    -



Vol.

0.00



Mkt cap

174.94M



P/E

    -



Div/yield

0.32/∞



EPS

-1.21



Shares

18.53M



Beta

    -



Inst. own

66%































News





Relevance



Date











All news for JP Energy Partners LP »

Subscribe






Advertisement


Key stats and ratios




Q3 (Sep '16)
2015


Net profit margin
-5.61%
-6.42%

Operating margin
-5.17%
-5.78%

EBITD margin
-
5.52%

Return on average assets
-4.01%
-5.65%

Return on average equity
-5.99%
-7.95%

Employees
737
-

CDP Score
-

-


Screen stocks with similar metrics »

Address
600 Las Colinas Blvd E Ste 2000IRVING, TX 75039-5607United States
- Map+1-972-4440300 (Phone)+1-302-6365454 (Fax)

External links

Analyst Estimates - MarketWatch
SEC Filings - EDGAR Online
Major Holders - MSN Money
Research Reports - Reuters















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view



Volume delayed by 15 mins.Prices are not from all markets.

Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel







Sector: Utilities > Industry: Natural Gas Utilities - NEC

More from FactSet »










Description




JP Energy Partners LP owns, operates, develops and acquires a portfolio of midstream energy assets. The Company provides midstream infrastructure solutions for the supply of crude oil, refined products and natural gas liquids (NGLs) in the United States. The Company's segments include crude oil pipelines and storage, refined products terminals and storage, and NGL distribution and sales. The Company's crude oil businesses are situated in areas, including the Permian Basin and Eagle Ford shale. Its crude oil pipelines and storage segment manages the physical movement of crude oil from origination to final destination through its network of owned and leased assets. Its refined product terminals and storage segment consists of approximately two refined products terminals located in North Little Rock, Arkansas and Caddo Mills, Texas. The Company's NGL distribution and sales segment involves the retail, commercial and wholesale sale of NGLs and other refined products.


More from Reuters »












Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service



JP Energy Partners LP

































  Notizie
                

Analysts Set Amarin Corporation PLC (NASDAQ:AMRN) PT at $7.35 
Meg Whitman Will NOT Be the Next Uber CEO 
Inc. Has $667000 Stake in PPG Industries, Inc. (PPG) 
The Prudential Financial Inc. Sells 2334 Shares of Stryker Corporation (NYSE:SYK) 
Instinet Reaffirms "Buy" Rating for MGM Resorts International (NYSE:MGM) 
YouTube TV is now live, though only in five major American cities 
InterOcean Capital LLC Buys 33174 Shares of Cisco Systems, Inc. (CSCO) 


























Notizia
Affari Cultura Scienza Sportivo Internazionale Salute Nazionale 




Affari
Cultura
Scienza
Sportivo
Internazionale
Salute
Nazionale


 


JP Energy Partners LP
Paterniano Del Favero
Luglio 26, 2017



Condividere













BidaskClub has downgraded VTTI Energy Partners LP (NYSE:VTTI) to Hold in a statement released on Sunday July 16, 2017.Several other large investors also recently made changes to their positions in VTTI. Clearbridge Investments LLC now owns 1,326,625 shares of the oil and gas company's stock worth $25,206,000 after buying an additional 46,559 shares during the period. UBS Group AG increased its stake in shares of VTTI Energy Partners by 773.5% in the first quarter. The fund owned 618,759 shares of the oil and gas company's stock after buying an additional 292,651 shares during the period. Finally, Mizuho Securities USA Inc. bought a new position in VTTI Energy Partners during the first quarter worth $335,000.Shares of VTTI Energy Partners LP (NYSE:VTTI) traded down 0.25% during mid-day trading on Friday, reaching $19.65. VTTI Energy Partners LP has a 12-month low of $15.40 and a 12-month high of $21.45. The company has a market cap of $916.73 million, a price-to-earnings ratio of 33.76 and a beta of 1.18. The company has recorded a 50-day moving average of $19.59 and a two hundred day average of $18.90.WARNING: This story was posted by Markets Daily and is the sole property of of Markets Daily. If you are viewing this story on another domain, it was stolen and reposted in violation of United States and worldwide trademark and copyright laws. The correct version of this article can be viewed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/24/vtti-energy-partners-lp-vtti-shares-bought-by-morgan-stanley.html.A number of equities research analysts have issued reports on the stock.05/15/2015 - VTTI Energy Partners LP was downgraded to "hold" by analysts at Zacks. The average stock price target is $23.60 with zero analysts rating the company a strong buy, zero brokerages rating the company a buy, zero equity analysts rating the company a hold, zero equity analysts rating the company a underperform, and lastly zero analysts rating the company a sell. Finally, DA Davidson lowered shares of VTTI Energy Partners from a "buy" rating to a "neutral" rating and set a $19.50 target price on the stock.in a report on Monday, May 8th. One investment analyst has rated the stock with a sell rating and four have assigned a hold rating to the company. The company now has a consensus rating of "Hold" and a consensus target price of $19.33. Its terminals are located in worldwide supply and demand centers for refined petroleum products and crude oil and provide midstream infrastructure services to its customers at these global market hubs. The Company operates through the segment of energy storage terminaling business.Want to see what other hedge funds are holding VTTI?

 




Altre relazioni OverNewsmagazine 









26 Luglio 2017




Rick Ross on women rappers: "I would end up f***ing"









26 Luglio 2017




A Controversial Chemical Has Been Found In Ben & Jerry's Ice Cream









26 Luglio 2017




Labour may switch to opposing Brexit if the public mood changes











26 Luglio 2017




Autostrade: ok da Tar Lazio su aumenti dei pedaggi. Codacons: sbagliato









26 Luglio 2017




Kate Hudson shaves her head for new role









26 Luglio 2017




Salmonella outbreak linked to papayas kills 1, sickens 47 in 12 states











26 Luglio 2017




Justin Trudeau Gets Rolling Stone Endorsement: 'Why Can't He Be Our President?'









26 Luglio 2017




Babumoshai Bandookbaaz Barfani song: Nawazuddin Siddiqui and Bidita Bag love it up









26 Luglio 2017




Officer shot during struggle with home invasion suspect, one dead











26 Luglio 2017




House Passes Bill to Impose New Sanctions on Russia









26 Luglio 2017




Amit Shah, Smriti Irani selected for contesting in Gujarat's Rajya Sabha elections









26 Luglio 2017




Jessica Biel and Justin Timberlake's son Silas has 'swagger'









Recenti News Articoli


 
SL Green Realty Corporation (NYSE:SLG) Upgraded to Sell at BidaskClub




 
Need for Speed: Payback 'Customization' trailer, screenshots




 
Sushant Singh Rajput & Jacqueline Fernandez To 'Drive' You Crazy On Holi 2018




Discuti questo articolo








 PIÙ POPOLARE OverNewsmagazine




Chunky pandey in prabhas's sahoo



Philip Morris International Inc (PM) Position Cut by LS Investment Advisors LLC



Israel to remove metal detectors from holy site of al-Aqsa


Allegheny Technologies Incorporated (NYSE:ATI) Reviewed By Analysts



Roof of Mercedes-Benz Stadium will be closed to start football season



Effective Treatment Prevents HIV Transmission Among Gay Couples, Study Finds



Pro Kabaddi Season 5: Kicks-off at Hyderabad on July 28



United Kingdom  sales of new petrol and diesel cars banned from 2040



Gujarat: Congress leader Ahmed Patel files nomination for Rajya Sabha elections



Steve Scalise released from Washington hospital







SEGUI I NOSTRI GIORNALE











ULTIME NOTIZIE OverNewsmagazine



 
Analysts Set Amarin Corporation PLC (NASDAQ:AMRN) PT at $7.35


Meg Whitman Will NOT Be the Next Uber CEO


Inc. Has $667000 Stake in PPG Industries, Inc. (PPG)


The Prudential Financial Inc. Sells 2334 Shares of Stryker Corporation (NYSE:SYK)


Instinet Reaffirms "Buy" Rating for MGM Resorts International (NYSE:MGM)


U.S. dollar falls despite solid data


Wisconsin football is holding an open practice in Milwaukee


Analysts See $0.85 EPS for Atlas Air Worldwide Holdings, Inc. (AAWW)


Boeing vola in borsa grazie ai buoni risultati


United States Q2 GDP Numbers Miss, Q1 Revised Lower (SPY)







ALTRE NOTIZIE


Scienza
Cultura
Affari









To make proper policies for EVs and hybrid vehicles government will ne...








I dubbi permangono,  nonostante a questo punto si possa dire con certe...









Jetzt hat der  Europäische Gerichtshof (EuGH ) jedoch ein 2014 ausgeha...









Adobe  indique qu'il continuera tout de même à corriger les failles cr...









CSX Corporation (CSX) opened at 50.00 on Friday. Vanguard Group Inc. n...












Murray was conducting a report on protests initiated by American Airli...









Meanwhile, Katy's single " Chained To The Rhythm " is nominated for Be...









Latest media report suggests that the yet untitled project will be a m...









A quanto pare la piccola  Grace , che Clio chiama simpaticamente anche...









The longer-range version is available now for the thousands of Tesla e...











Amarin  Corp Plc now has $1.07B valuation. They now have a Dollars  2 ...








It is unclear whether or not the transportation services company had t...








Sison now forecasts that the specialty chemicals company will post ear...








It has underperformed by 5.81% the S&P500. Therefore 57% are positive....








Though revival of gaming revenues in Macau is a huge positive, it will...
























© 2017 overnewsmagazine.com, OverNewsmagazine




Sportivo
Scienza
Cultura
Affari


Nazionale
Salute
Internazionale





Edizione

Contatti











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft










  JPEP Stock Quote - JP Energy Partners LP - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  JP Energy Partners LP   JPEP:US      Acquired   JPEP:US was acquired by AMID:US   USD             Volume   0    52Wk Range   6.49 - 10.58                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    52Wk Range   6.49 - 10.58    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -0.37    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding  (m)   18.551    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   13.77%        Sector Energy   % Price Change -0.19%     Industry Energy   % Price Change -0.19%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     3/6/2017   JP Energy Partners to Be Removed from the Alerian Small Cap MLP Index     3/2/2017   JP Energy Partners LP Announces 2016 Schedule K-1 Availability    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   JP Energy Partners LP offers midstream services to the crude oil industry. The Company provides supply and logistics services including storage and marketing of crude oil, refined products, and natural gas liquids. JP Energy partners serves crude oil refineries, oil product distributors, and end consumers throughout the United States and internationally.    Address  600 East Las Colinas BlvdSuite 2000Irving, TX 75039United States   Phone  1-972-444-0300   Website   www.jpenergypartners.com     Executives Board Members    Jason Patrick Barley  Chairman/President/CEO    Jon E Hanna  Exec VP:Crude Oil    Shiming Chen "Simon"  Senior VP/Chief Acctg Officer    Cory Willis  Senior VP:Terminals & Distribution    Deborah W Kryak  Senior VP:Operations     Show More         








JP Energy Partners LP - :JPEP - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















JP Energy Partners LP (JPEP)
Follow




                                    9.44
                                

0.07
0.74




Mar 7, 2017 4:02 PM EST












Prev Close
  9.51


Open
9.45


Day Low/High

                                    9.30 /
                                    9.64


52 Wk Low/High

                                    4.56 /
                                    10.58
                                


Volume
58.40K


Avg Volume 
83.60K











Exchange



Shares Outstanding
36.66M


Market Cap
342.38M


EPS
-1.60


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            1.30
                                            (13.90%)

                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News




JP Energy Partners To Be Removed From The Alerian Small Cap MLP Index






JP Energy Partners LP Announces 2016 Schedule K-1 Availability













Reminder - JP Energy Partners (JPEP) Goes Ex-Dividend Soon
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 2/3/17, JP Energy Partners LP will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.325, payable on 2/14/17. As a percentage of JPEP's recent stock price of $10.54, this dividend works out to approximately 3.08%, so look for shares of JP Energy Partners LP to trade 3.08% lower — all else being equal — when JPEP shares open for trading on 2/3/17.

Feb 1, 2017 10:45 AM EST













JP Energy Partners Announces Fourth Quarter 2016 Distribution
JP Energy Partners LP ("JP Energy" or "JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) announced today that the Board of Directors of its general partner has declared a cash distribution for the fourth quarter of 2016 of $0.

Jan 24, 2017 8:00 AM EST













JP Energy Partners LP Announces Record Date And Meeting Date For Special Meeting For Proposed Merger With American Midstream Partners, LP
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy" or "our") today announced that it has established a record date of January 30, 2017, and a meeting date of March 7, 2017, for a special meeting of its unitholders.

Jan 20, 2017 8:00 AM EST









This Stock Has A 13.02% Yield And Sells For Less Than Book
JP Energy Partners LP has been named as a Top 10 dividend paying energy stock, according to Dividend Channel, which published its weekly ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among energy companies, JPEP shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Jan 19, 2017 9:43 AM EST













JP Energy Partners LP Announces Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy," "we," "our," or "us") today announced financial and operating results for the third quarter of 2016.

Nov 7, 2016 4:10 PM EST













Reminder - JP Energy Partners (JPEP) Goes Ex-Dividend Soon
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 11/2/16, JP Energy Partners LP will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.325, payable on 11/11/16. As a percentage of JPEP's recent stock price of $8.25, this dividend works out to approximately 3.94%, so look for shares of JP Energy Partners LP to trade 3.94% lower — all else being equal — when JPEP shares open for trading on 11/2/16.

Oct 31, 2016 10:12 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners Announces Timing Of Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results And Conference Call
JP Energy Partners LP ("JP Energy" or "JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) today announced that it will release its third quarter 2016 results on Monday, November 7, 2016 after the close of the New York Stock Exchange.

Oct 31, 2016 8:00 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners Reaches Analyst Target Price
In recent trading, shares of JP Energy Partners LP have crossed above the average analyst 12-month target price of $8.15, changing hands for $8.39/share. When a stock reaches the target an analyst has set, the analyst logically has two ways to react: downgrade on valuation, or, re-adjust their target price to a higher level.

Oct 25, 2016 9:11 AM EDT













American Midstream Partners To Merge With JP Energy Partners, Creating A $2 Billion Diversified Midstream MLP
American Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE: AMID) ("American Midstream") and JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy") announced today their execution of a merger agreement to create a combined midstream platform.

Oct 24, 2016 6:00 AM EDT













American Midstream Partners To Merge With JP Energy Partners, Creating A $2 Billion Diversified Midstream MLP
American Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE: AMID) ("American Midstream") and JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy") announced today their execution of a merger agreement to create a combined midstream platform.

Oct 24, 2016 6:00 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners Announces Third Quarter 2016 Distribution
JP Energy Partners LP ("JP Energy" or "JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) announced today that the Board of Directors of its general partner has declared a cash distribution for the third quarter of 2016 of $0.

Oct 21, 2016 4:15 PM EDT













This Stock Has A 17.00% Yield And Sells For Less Than Book
JP Energy Partners LP has been named as a Top 10 dividend paying energy stock, according to Dividend Channel, which published its weekly ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among energy companies, JPEP shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Oct 20, 2016 7:23 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners LP Announces Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy", "we," "our," or "us") today announced financial and operating results for the second quarter of 2016 and provided updated guidance for 2016.

Aug 8, 2016 4:10 PM EDT













3 Stocks With Upcoming Ex-Dividend Dates: JPEP, SDLP, IDA
JPEP SDLP IDA are going ex-dividend Wednesday, Wednesday, August 03, 2016

Aug 2, 2016 10:00 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners About To Put More Money In Your Pocket (JPEP)
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 8/3/16, JP Energy Partners LP will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.325, payable on 8/12/16. As a percentage of JPEP's recent stock price of $9.95, this dividend works out to approximately 3.27%, so look for shares of JP Energy Partners LP to trade 3.27% lower — all else being equal — when JPEP shares open for trading on 8/3/16.

Aug 1, 2016 10:06 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners Announces Second Quarter 2016 Distribution And Timing Of Financial Results And Conference Call
JP Energy Partners LP ("JP Energy" or "JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) announced today that the Board of Directors of its general partner has declared a cash distribution for the second quarter of 2016 of $0.

Jul 25, 2016 4:05 PM EDT













This Stock Has A 15.94% Yield And Sells For Less Than Book
JP Energy Partners LP has been named as a Top 10 dividend paying energy stock, according to Dividend Channel, which published its weekly ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among energy companies, JPEP shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Jul 21, 2016 9:26 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners To Participate In The 2016 MLPA Annual Investor Conference
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE:JPEP) today announced their participation in the 2016 MLPA Annual Investor Conference in Orlando, Florida on June 2-3, 2016.

May 24, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners LP Announces First Quarter 2016 Financial Results
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE:JPEP) ("JP Energy", "we," "our," or "us") today announced first quarter 2016 financial and operating results.

May 9, 2016 4:15 PM EDT













Tomorrow's Ex-Dividends To Watch: JPEP, GNL, STL
JPEP GNL STL are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, May 04, 2016

May 3, 2016 10:00 AM EDT













Reminder - JP Energy Partners (JPEP) Goes Ex-Dividend Soon
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 5/4/16, JP Energy Partners LP will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.325, payable on 5/13/16. As a percentage of JPEP's recent stock price of $7.44, this dividend works out to approximately 4.37%, so look for shares of JP Energy Partners LP to trade 4.37% lower — all else being equal — when JPEP shares open for trading on 5/4/16.

May 2, 2016 10:57 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners Announces Timing Of First Quarter 2016 Financial Results And Conference Call
JP Energy Partners LP ("JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) today announced that it will release its first quarter 2016 results on Monday, May 9, 2016 after the close of the New York Stock Exchange.

May 2, 2016 8:30 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners Announces First Quarter 2016 Distribution
JP Energy Partners LP ("JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) announced today that the Board of Directors of its general partner has declared a cash distribution for the first quarter of 2016 of $0.

Apr 25, 2016 5:47 PM EDT













This Stock Has A 19.76% Yield And Sells For Less Than Book
JP Energy Partners LP has been named as a Top 10 dividend paying energy stock, according to Dividend Channel, which published its weekly ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among energy companies, JPEP shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Apr 21, 2016 7:55 AM EDT













JP Energy Partners LP Announces 2015 Schedule K-1 Availability
JP Energy Partners LP ("JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) today announced that it has completed the 2015 tax packages for its unitholders, including Schedule K-1.

Mar 9, 2016 5:38 PM EST













JP Energy Partners LP Announces Fourth Quarter And Full-Year 2015 Financial Results
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy", "we," "our," or "us") today announced fourth quarter and full-year 2015 financial and operating results.

Feb 29, 2016 4:15 PM EST













JP Energy Partners To Participate In The Barclays MLP Corporate Access Day
JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE:JPEP) today announced their participation in the Barclays MLP Corporate Access Day in New York City on Wednesday, March 2, 2016.

Feb 24, 2016 8:00 AM EST













JP Energy Partners Announces Timing Of Fourth Quarter And Full-Year 2015 Financial Results And Conference Call
JP Energy Partners LP ("JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) today announced that it will release its fourth quarter and full-year 2015 results on Monday, February 29, 2016 after the close of the New York Stock Exchange.

Feb 22, 2016 8:00 AM EST



















Next






Load More








From Our Partners



The 12% Yielding American Midstream Partners Bargain

SeekingAlpha



MLPs: MLPs Plan, Oil Laughs

SeekingAlpha



Bank Of America Rising

SeekingAlpha



After Hours Gainers / Losers

SeekingAlpha



AT&T Deal Is Just The Beginning

SeekingAlpha



Verizon Plots Next Big Move

SeekingAlpha



JP Energy Partners declares $0.325 dividend

SeekingAlpha



MLPs: Beginning To Look A Lot Like Christmas

SeekingAlpha



American Midstream Partners Clears Some Major Progress Hurdles

SeekingAlpha



MLPs Lag Despite Right Stuff

SeekingAlpha



After Hours Gainers / Losers

SeekingAlpha



JP Energy Partners (JPEP) presents at RBC Capital Markets MLP Conference - Slideshow

SeekingAlpha



JP Energy Partners misses by $0.07, misses on revenue

SeekingAlpha



What Happened Last Week: Why The AMID/JPEP Merger Made MLP History

SeekingAlpha



Notable earnings after Monday’s close

SeekingAlpha


































 


















Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 

















The VTTI Energy Partners (VTTI) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds













Сontactos











 Home
/ Negocios
/ The VTTI Energy Partners (VTTI) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds 



The VTTI Energy Partners (VTTI) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds

Rai Favela |
Miércoles, Julio 26, 2017







Media stories about JP Energy Partners (NYSE:JPEP) have been trending very positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. JPMorgan Chase & Co. now owns 7,889 shares of the oil and gas company's stock worth $150,000 after buying an additional 139 shares during the last quarter. Clearbridge Investments LLC now owns 1,326,625 shares of the oil and gas company's stock worth $25,206,000 after buying an additional 46,559 shares during the period.03/17/2016 - VTTI Energy Partners LP was downgraded to "neutral" by analysts at Credit Suisse. The company had a trading volume of 201,774 shares. VTTI Energy Partners earned a coverage optimism score of 0.08 on Accern's scale.
VTTI Energy Partners (NYSE VTTI) remained flat at $19.65 on Monday. The stock's market capitalization is 916.73M. The company has recorded a 50-day moving average of $19.59 and a two hundred day average of $18.90.ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This news story was reported by The Cerbat Gem and is the property of of The Cerbat Gem. If you are reading this news story on another publication, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of United States and global copyright law. The original version of this piece can be viewed at https://stocknewstimes.com/2017/07/23/mizuho-securities-usa-llc-buys-147325-shares-of-vtti-energy-partners-lp-vtti.html.Several equities analysts recently weighed in on VTTI shares.According to the latest research reports released, 0 analysts have issued a rating of "buy", 0 analysts "outperform", 4 analysts "hold", 0 analysts "underperform" and 0 analysts "sell". Finally, Citigroup Inc. lowered VTTI Energy Partners from a "buy" rating to a "neutral" rating and set a $19.50 price objective on the stock.in a research report on Monday, May 8th. VTTI Energy Partners now has an average rating of "Hold" and an average price target of $19.33. BidaskClub downgraded shares of VTTI Energy Partners from a "buy" rating to a "hold" rating in a report on Sunday, July 16th. One analyst has rated the stock with a sell rating and four have given a hold rating to the stock. The company now has a consensus rating of "Hold" and a consensus target price of $19.33. The Company operates through the segment of energy storage terminaling business. Its assets consist of approximately 42.6% interest in VTTI MLP B.V., which owns a portfolio of over six terminals with over 400 tanks and approximately 35.7 million barrels of refined petroleum product and crude oil storage capacity located in Europe, the Middle East, Asia and North America. The Company's segments include crude oil pipelines and storage, refined products terminals and storage, and NGL distribution and sales.




Latest News
 

Amarin Corporation PLC Sees Unusually High Options Volume (NASDAQ:AMRN)



Jeffrey Immelt on shortlist for post of Uber CEO



Inc. Has $667000 Stake in PPG Industries, Inc. (PPG)



Schwab Charles Investment Management Inc. Raises Stake in MGM Resorts International (MGM)



Badgers to hold preseason practice Aug



La economía española creció el 0.9 % en el segundo trimestre de 2017



Atlas Air Worldwide Holdings (NASDAQ:AAWW) Stake Boosted by Vanguard Group Inc



Canadian May GDP Rose 0.6%, Vindication For Bank of Canada Rate Hike



Would You Buy Trinity Industries, Inc. (NYSE:TRN) On These Analyst Ratings?



Kansas City Southern (NYSE:KSU) Analyst Recommendation



Evasión en Transantiago disminuyó a 30,3% entre abril y junio



Unesco decidida a preservar zona colonial de Quito, Ecuador



TransCanada may decide not to build Keystone XL



Which Analysts Are Watching Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Limited (NYSE:TEVA)?











Sábado, Julio 29, 2017  





Popular news



Crown Castle International Corporation (NYSE:CCI) Downgraded to "Hold" at BidaskClub 
				ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This news story was first reported by Stock Observer and is the sole property of of Stock Observer. On June 12 the company was changed to a "Market Perform" by Raymond James down from the previous "Outperform" rating.


Johnson, Hadwin headline Canadian Open field 
				He won by three shots - the same margin he started the day with - after a final round 1-under-69.  Jordan Spieth is the British Open champion.


Here's what happened the last time the VIX traded this low 
				A key measure of market volatility set a new floor Tuesday, falling to its lowest level ever in intraday trading. The CBOE index, called VIX , didn't set a record closing low, settling at 9.43 at the end of the day.


Corinthians recibe a Patriotas con equipo mixto — Copa Sudamericana 
				Por su parte, Patriotas se prepara desde ayer en la cancha del Palmeiras de Sao Paulo, el gran rival paulista del Corinthians . Tampoco podrá alinear al estelar Clayson, que adquirió recientemente del Ponte Preta.


El equipo Mercedes deja el DTM 
				Mercedes, junto con Alejandro Agag , entrará como escudería de la Formula E en la sexta temporada (2019-20), un año después de lo planeado.


Se prevén, durante las próximas horas, tormentas intensas en Guerrero y Oaxaca 
				Viento del noreste de 15 a 30 km/h, con rachas de 50 km/h durante la presencia de sistemas de tormenta en la región. Así como ambiente cálido y viento del este y noreste de 15 a 30 km/h, con rachas que pueden superar los 50 km/h.


'Revolutionary': Study of gay couples shows HIV transmission can be stopped 
				The study followed 358 gay male couples, one HIV-positive and one HIV-negative, from Thailand, Brazil, and Australia. Grulich described the discovery as "transformative" for gay male couples with differing HIV status.


Original propuesta de matrimonio en el Tour de Francia 
				El Tour de Francia concluyó este domingo y fue ganado por el británico Christopher Froome, seguido del galo Warren Barguil y el alemán Michael Matthews.


CoreSite Realty Corporation (COR) Shares Sold by Teachers Advisors LLC 
				It has outperformed by 152.93% the S&P500. (NYSE:SLG)'s stock has been a favorite of "smart money" aka institutions, as of late. After $1.45 actual EPS reported by Bank of Montreal (USA) for the previous quarter, Wall Street now forecasts 1.38% EPS growth.


Pro Kabaddi League 2017: Know your captains of PKL Season 5 
				As debutants, not many expected the Uttar Pradesh based outfit to get their balance right in their very first season. Considered to be one of the star performers in the history of PKL, Rohit has scored 209 raid points.


Chunky Pandey to play a prominent role in Saaho 
				It looked justified as the character needed a stylish, young and menacing villain who also is a noted face to pan-India audience. However, Prabhas' fans now worry that the film may finally turn out to be a Hindi film and lose the nativity factor.


Kushner's statement on Russia: What you need to know 
				The Trump administration could leverage the authority to get Europe to cooperate on the new Russian energy sanctions, he said. This report has all the details of Trump about contacts with Russian Federation and also the Trump's movements and evolution.


Rick Ross' reason for not signing female acts is sexist and offensive 
				We all know Rick Ross is a boss player when it comes to building his empire. "I gotta f*ck a couple times", Ross said giggling. Ross made the controversial comments in an interview with Power 105.1 FM's Breakfast Club this week.


Suspects Arrested While Trying to Steal Equipment Used to Fight Detwiler Fire 
				Three suspects were arrested Sunday when officers found stolen firefighting equipment used in the Detwiler Fire in their auto . The items included a generator, first aid kit, power tools, and multiple other miscellaneous items, the Sheriff's Office said.


Turkey, Israel trade barbs over Jerusalem holy site 
				According to Reuters news agency, crews were seen removing the detectors and recently-installed cameras early on Tuesday. In response to that attack, Israel closed the shrine for two days for weapons searches and installed the metal detectors.







Follow Us









Categories


Mundo


Medicina


Deportes


Tecnología


Espectáculos


Negocios






Recommended stories



Amarin Corporation PLC Sees Unusually High Options Volume (NASDAQ:AMRN)




Jeffrey Immelt on shortlist for post of Uber CEO




Inc. Has $667000 Stake in PPG Industries, Inc. (PPG)




Schwab Charles Investment Management Inc. Raises Stake in MGM Resorts International (MGM)




Badgers to hold preseason practice Aug




La economía española creció el 0.9 % en el segundo trimestre de 2017




Atlas Air Worldwide Holdings (NASDAQ:AAWW) Stake Boosted by Vanguard Group Inc




Canadian May GDP Rose 0.6%, Vindication For Bank of Canada Rate Hike




Would You Buy Trinity Industries, Inc. (NYSE:TRN) On These Analyst Ratings?




Kansas City Southern (NYSE:KSU) Analyst Recommendation




Evasión en Transantiago disminuyó a 30,3% entre abril y junio




Unesco decidida a preservar zona colonial de Quito, Ecuador




Adele Climbs U.K. Rich List, Paul McCartney Still On Top




McDonald's, Cinnabon, Hooters offer Tax Day freebies




Flow battery could run for more than 10 years













JP Energy Partners LP: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback















jp energy partners lp
Public Company









Company Profile
Sector: Energy
Industry: Oil, Gas & Coal
Sub-Industry: Midstream - Oil & Gas
JP Energy Partners LP offers midstream services to the crude oil industry. The Company provides supply and logistics services including storage and marketing of crude oil, refined products, and natural gas liquids. JP Energy partners serves crude oil refineries, oil product distributors, and end consumers throughout the United States and internationally.




Corporate Information
Address:

600 East Las Colinas Blvd
Suite 2000
Irving, TX 75039
United States


Phone:
1-972-444-0300


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.jpenergypartners.com





Board Members




Chairman/President/CEO
Company


Jason Patrick Barley
JP Energy Partners LP








Board Members
Company


Daniel Revers
Arclight Capital Partners LLC


Norman Szydlowski
8point3 Energy Partners LP


John Erhard
Arclight Capital Partners LLC


Greg Arnold
Truman Arnold Cos


Josh Sherman
Opportune LLP


T Trimble
Fleur de Lis Energy LLC


Evan Schwartz
Arclight Capital Partners LLC




Show More
























From The Web












Press Releases




JP Energy Partners to Be Removed from the Alerian Small Cap MLP Index

Mar 06, 2017



JP Energy Partners LP Announces 2016 Schedule K-1 Availability

Mar 02, 2017






Key Executives


Jason Patrick Barley


Chairman/President/CEO




Jon E Hanna


Exec VP:Crude Oil




Shiming Chen "Simon"


Senior VP/Chief Acctg Officer




Cory Willis


Senior VP:Terminals & Distribution




Deborah W Kryak


Senior VP:Operations







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data




































 







JP Energy Partners LP : Articles :: Law360


































Search




Advanced Search

Take a Free Trial | 
					Sign In






















 Close


Law360 In-Depth
Law360 UK
Adv. Search & Platform Tools
Browse all sections 
Banking
Bankruptcy
Class Action
Competition
Employment
Energy
Expert Analysis
Insurance
Intellectual Property
Product Liability
Securities
Rankings
Law360's MVPs
Glass Ceiling Report
Global 20
Law360 400
Diversity Snapshot
Practice Group Partner Rankings
Practice Groups of the Year
Pro Bono Firms of the Year
Rising Stars
Trial Aces
Site Menu
Join the Law360 team
Search legal jobs
Learn more about Law360
Read testimonials
Contact Law360
Sign up for our newsletters
Site Map
Help













JP Energy Partners LP


 News & Case Alert  on JP Energy Partners LP



Basic Materials » Oil & Gas Refining & Marketing » JP Energy Partners LP







Alert me of new articles

Menu options for JP Energy Partners LP 


Everything »
News & Analysis »
New Cases »
New PTAB Cases »
Case Activity »
Outside Counsel »


Sections


Banking (1)
California (1)
Capital Markets (6)
Commercial Contracts (1)
Corporate (1)
Energy (9)
Environmental (1)
Insurance (2)
International Trade (1)
Mergers & Acquisitions (4)
Pennsylvania (1)
Private Equity (6)
Project Finance (3)
Tax (1)
Technology (1)
Texas (3)







×
Search within the list below:







Name
Count






Continue
Cancel










×
Please assign a name to this alert






Save Alert
Cancel













Search News


















News (9)


March 15, 2017
Pipe Maker Sues Insurer Over Coverage For Faulty Pipeline
... Indemnity Co., requires the insurer to defend the company in the underlying dispute with JP Energy Permian...


October 28, 2016
Taxation With Representation: Paul Weiss, Skadden, Sullivan
... statement said.

American Midstream Partners To Buy JP Energy In $2B Deal

Two oil and gas companies...


October 24, 2016
American Midstream Partners To Buy JP Energy In $2B Deal
... percent of JP Energy Partners LP under the agreement. The combined company — which will gather...


July 29, 2015
ArcLight Raises $5.58B For Latest Energy Infrastructure Fund
... October, ArcLight-controlled midstream oil and gas company JP Energy Partners LP raised $275 million in an...


July 16, 2015
Infigen Unloads US Wind Biz In $272M Sale To ArcLight
... confined to the renewable energy sector. In October, ArcLight-controlled midstream oil and gas company JP...


October 15, 2014
Dominion Set To Raise Up To $368M For LNG Project In IPO
....   

Other recent players include private equity-backed Texas midstream oil and gas company JP Energy...


September 25, 2014
Cone Midstream Prices High With $385M IPO
... JP Energy Partners LP set terms Monday for an IPO of up to $332 million. Last week, private equity...


September 23, 2014
PE-Backed JP Energy Sets Terms For $332M IPO
...Private equity-backed JP Energy Partners LP set terms Monday for an up to $332 million initial...


May  8, 2014
PE-Backed JP Energy Partners Files For $200M IPO
...Texas-based JP Energy Partners LP expects to raise $200 million in an initial public offering on...



	Show: 2050100200















×
Already have access? Click here to login



Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers
Register Now!




Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers













Email (Professional email required)






First Name



Last Name







PLEASE NOTE: A verification email will be sent to your address before you can access your trial.


Password (at least 6 characters required)



Confirm Password







Select at least one primary interest:


 Aerospace & Defense
										

 Appellate
										

 Asset Management
										

 Automotive
										

 Banking
										

 Bankruptcy
										

 California
										

 Capital Markets
										

 Class Action
										

 Commercial Contracts
										

 Competition
										

 Consumer Protection
										

 Corporate
										

 Cybersecurity & Privacy
										

 Delaware
										

 Employment
										

 Energy
										

 Environmental
										

 Financial Services Uk
										

 Florida
										

 Food & Beverage
										

 Government Contracts
										

 Health
										

 Hospitality
										

 Illinois
										

 Immigration
										

 Insurance
										

 Insurance Uk
										

 Intellectual Property
										

 International Arbitration
										

 International Trade
										

 Law360 In Depth
										

 Legal Ethics
										

 Life Sciences
										

 Media & Entertainment
										

 Medical Malpractice
										

 Mergers & Acquisitions
										

 Native American
										

 New Jersey
										

 New York
										

 Pennsylvania
										

 Private Equity
										

 Product Liability
										

 Project Finance
										

 Public Policy
										

 Real Estate
										

 Retail & E Commerce
										

 Securities
										

 Sports
										

 Tax
										

 Technology
										

 Telecommunications
										

 Texas
										

 Transportation
										

 Trials
										

 White Collar
										





Register




Already have access?




Email:



Password:

Forgot your password?


Remember login



Sign In




















About JP Energy Partners LP (0JPu) - Investing.com





























































































x




Breaking News












How would you best describe yourself?
Individual Investor Institutional Investor Financial Advisor Active Trader 


Thank you!











 
 
















 Search website for: 





Popular Searches












Trending Stocks 
Stock Screener 






Sign in/Sign up 

0

Recent Alerts


Sign up to create alerts for Instruments, 
Economic Events and content by followed authors
Sign up Already have an account? Sign in

 







English (UK)TürkçeEnglish (India)‏العربية‏English (Canada)ΕλληνικάEnglish (Australia)SvenskaEnglish (South Africa)SuomiDeutschעבריתEspañol (España)日本語Español (México)한국어Français中文Italiano香港NederlandsBahasa IndonesiaPortuguês (Portugal)Bahasa MelayuPolskiไทยPortuguês (Brasil)Tiếng ViệtРусский 





 



 


 




















JP Energy Partners LP (0JPu)	


 
Frankfurt








Create Alert 

Create Alert



New!
Create Alert


Website

As an alert notification
To use this feature, make sure you are signed-in to your account



Mobile App





To use this feature, make sure you are signed-in to your account
Make sure you are signed-in with the same user profile





Condition


Price
Change
Volume





Moves above
Moves below


Frequency
Once                


Gains / Loses
Gains
Loses

%
					Frequency
Recurring
Once



Volume exceeds


Frequency
Recurring
Once



For all future releases
Just for the upcoming release
Send me a reminder 1 trading day before






Delivery Method
 Website popup
 Mobile App notifications
 Email Notifications


Status









Create Manage my alerts 



Back 

 



 

Add to/Remove from a Portfolio
My Portfolio









Add to Watchlist				

Add Position				




Position added successfully to:					










Please name your holdings portfolio




Type:

BUY
SELL



Date:










 



Amount:



Price



Point Value:






Leverage:

1:1
1:10
1:25
1:50
1:100
1:200
1:400
1:500
1:1000



Commission:









 

Create a new watchlist
Create 


Create a new holdings portfolio
Add
Create 

+ Add another position
Close 














9.44
0.00
  
0.00%



07/03 - Closed. Currency in EUR ( Disclaimer )


 

Type:
Equity


Market:
Germany


ISIN:
US46643C1099 


S/N:
A12B3M

 



Volume: 0
Bid/Ask: 0.00 / 0.00
Day's Range: 9.30 - 9.64

 
START TRADING NOW 





JP Energy Partners
9.44
0.00
0.00%




START TRADING NOW



 

                General                 
 


Chart
 
 


Streaming Chart
Interactive Chart




News & Analysis
 
 


News
Analysis & Opinion




Financials
 
 


Financial Summary
Income Statement
Balance Sheet
Cash Flow
Ratios
Dividends
Earnings




Technical
 
 


Technical Analysis
Candlestick Patterns
Consensus Estimates




Forum
 
 


Discussions
Recent Sentiments
User Rankings






Overview


Profile


Historical Data


Options




JP Energy Partners LP Company Profile

 
			

Get an in-depth profile of JP Energy Partners LP, including a general overview of the company's business and key management, as well as employee data and location and contact information.









 


IndustryOil & Gas Operations
SectorEnergy
Employees737
Equity TypeUnit


JP Energy Partners LP owns, operates, develops and acquires a portfolio of midstream energy assets. The Company provides midstream infrastructure solutions for the supply of crude oil, refined products and natural gas liquids (NGLs) in the United States. The Company's segments include crude oil pipelines and storage, refined products terminals and storage, and NGL distribution and sales. The Company's crude oil businesses are situated in areas, including the Permian Basin and Eagle Ford shale. Its crude oil pipelines and storage segment manages the physical movement of crude oil from origination to final destination through its network of owned and leased assets. Its refined product terminals and storage segment consists of approximately two refined products terminals located in North Little Rock, Arkansas and Caddo Mills, Texas. The Company's NGL distribution and sales segment involves the retail, commercial and wholesale sale of NGLs and other refined products.


Contact Information


Address
Irving, TX 75039-5616United States



Phone
+1-972-4440300



Fax
302-6555049



Web
www.jpenergypartners.com




Loading...








Add a Comment

Comment Guidelines
 

        Comment Guidelines        


We encourage you to use comments to engage with users, share your perspective and ask questions of authors and each other. However, in order to maintain the high level of discourse we’ve all come to value and expect, please keep the following criteria in mind: 

Enrich the conversation
Stay focused and on track. Only post material that’s relevant to the topic being discussed.
Be respectful. Even negative opinions can be framed positively and diplomatically.
 Use standard writing style. Include punctuation and upper and lower cases.
NOTE: Spam and/or promotional messages and links within a comment will be removed
Avoid profanity, slander or personal attacks directed at an author or another user.
Don’t Monopolize the Conversation. We appreciate passion and conviction, but we also believe strongly in giving everyone a chance to air their thoughts. Therefore, in addition to civil interaction, we expect commenters to offer their opinions succinctly and thoughtfully, but not so repeatedly that others are annoyed or offended. If we receive complaints about individuals who take over a thread or forum, we reserve the right to ban them from the site, without recourse.
Only English comments will be allowed.

Perpetrators of spam or abuse will be deleted from the site and prohibited from future registration at Investing.com’s discretion. 
I have read Investing.com's comments guidelines and agree to the terms described.

I Agree 













 
Are you sure you want to delete this chart?


Delete Cancel


 










 
Replace the attached chart with a new chart ?


Replace Cancel


Post 
Post also to:


1000






Please wait a minute before you try to comment again.

 



Thanks for your comment. Please note that all comments are pending until approved by our moderators. It may therefore take some time before it appears on our website.




			
				
    
        
                                    {username}
                                Just Now
                
	
	
		
			Share
		

				
		
			
			Save		
	
	
		

	Saved. See Saved Items.
	


	This comment has already been saved in your Saved Items
	

	




		
			
				Report			
		
		
			Share this comment to:
		
	
                 Author's response                 
                                            
                            
                            
                        
                        
                            
                            
                            
                        
                                        {commentContent}
                    
                                            
                            Reply
							
	
	
	0
	
	
	0



                        
                                    
            
        
        			
			
				
    
        
                            {username}
                        Just Now
			 Author's response 			
	
	
		
			Share
		

				
		
			
			Save		
	
	
		

	Saved. See Saved Items.
	


	This comment has already been saved in your Saved Items
	

	




		
			
				Report			
		
		
			Share this comment to:
		
	
            
                                    
                        
                        
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                
                                {commentContent}
                
                                    
                        Reply
						
	
	
	0
	
	
	0



                    
                
            
        
    
			
			
				
					Show more comments ()
				
			
			
				
					Show more replies ()
				
			
		










 
Are you sure you want to delete this chart?


Delete Cancel


 










 
Replace the attached chart with a new chart ?


Replace Cancel


Post
1000






Please wait a minute before you try to comment again.

 

 


 
     



Report this comment

I feel that this comment is:
Spam
Offensive
Irrelevant


Submit 



Comment flagged



Thank You!
            Your report has been sent to our moderators for review        


Close 



Add Chart to Comment







Cancel
Attach 

Disclaimer: Fusion Media would like to remind you that the data  contained in this website is not necessarily real-time nor accurate.  All CFDs (stocks, indexes, futures) and Forex prices are not provided by exchanges but rather by market makers, and so prices may not be accurate and may differ from the actual market price, meaning prices are indicative and not appropriate for trading purposes.  Therefore Fusion Media doesn`t bear any responsibility for any trading losses you might incur as a result of using this data.
Fusion Media or anyone involved with Fusion Media will not accept any liability for loss or damage as a result of reliance on  the information including data, quotes, charts and buy/sell signals contained within this website. Please be fully informed regarding the risks and costs associated with trading the financial markets, it is one of the riskiest investment forms possible.  
 




Find A Broker



























 

 


Indices
Commodities
Forex
Bonds

More Categories

Tabs SelectionIndicesCommoditiesForexBondsStocksETFs%COUNT%/4 selected Apply1D1W1M6M1Y5YMax S&P 500 Futures2,470.50-1.50-0.06%  Nasdaq Futures5,913.62+4.12+0.07%  Dow 3021,830.31+33.76+0.15%  S&P 500 VIX10.29+0.18+1.78%  DAX12,162.70-49.34-0.40%  Nikkei 22519,959.84-119.80-0.60%  US Dollar Index93.20-0.57-0.61%  Euro Index93.73+0.38+0.40%  Gold1,269.34+9.34+0.74%  Silver16.731+0.158+0.95%  Copper2.881+0.004+0.12%  Crude Oil WTI49.80+0.76+1.55%  Brent Oil52.70+1.21+2.35%  Natural Gas2.928-0.039-1.31%  US Cotton #268.78-0.11-0.16%  US Coffee C137.98+2.43+1.79%  EUR/USD1.1750+0.0073+0.63%  GBP/USD1.3135+0.0070+0.54%  USD/JPY110.69-0.56-0.50%  USD/CAD1.2433-0.0122-0.97%  AUD/USD0.7986+0.0019+0.24%  USD/CNH6.7379-0.0061-0.09%  ETH/USD192.01-8.04-4.02%  BTC/USD2,780.6+84.5+3.14%  US 10Y Yield2.291-0.019-0.84%  US 30Y Yield2.895-0.033-1.11%  US 2Y Yield1.351-0.008-0.57%  US 5Y Yield1.834-0.011-0.60%  US 10Y T-Note125.93+0.17+0.14%  US 30Y T-Bond153.14+0.62+0.41%  Euro Bund162.03-0.13-0.08%  UK Gilt126.19-0.19-0.15%  Start Trading Today 
  


ForexCommoditiesIndicesStocks 




 Tabs Selection 

ForexCommoditiesIndicesStocksBondsETFs 
 %COUNT%/4 selected Apply


Timeframe                    
1 min.
5 mins
15 mins
30 mins
Hourly
5 Hours
Daily
Weekly










EUR/USD
1.1750

+0.0073 +0.63%



Summary
Strong Buy



Moving Averages:
Buy 8
Sell 4



Indicators:
Buy 6
Sell 2

 



EUR/USD
1.1750

+0.0073 +0.63%



Summary
Strong Buy



Moving Averages:
Buy 8
Sell 4



Indicators:
Buy 6
Sell 2



GBP/USD
1.3135

+0.0070 +0.54%



Summary
Neutral



Moving Averages:
Buy 7
Sell 5



Indicators:
Buy 3
Sell 4



USD/JPY
110.69

-0.56 -0.50%



Summary
Strong Sell



Moving Averages:
Buy 0
Sell 12



Indicators:
Buy 0
Sell 8



AUD/USD
0.7986

+0.0019 +0.24%



Summary
Strong Sell



Moving Averages:
Buy 5
Sell 7



Indicators:
Buy 1
Sell 6



USD/CAD
1.2433

-0.0122 -0.97%



Summary
Strong Buy



Moving Averages:
Buy 9
Sell 3



Indicators:
Buy 6
Sell 2



EUR/JPY
130.04

+0.16 +0.12%



Summary
Strong Sell



Moving Averages:
Buy 0
Sell 12



Indicators:
Buy 0
Sell 9



EUR/CHF
1.1381

+0.0115 +1.02%



Summary
Strong Sell



Moving Averages:
Buy 2
Sell 10



Indicators:
Buy 2
Sell 9



Gold Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Silver Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Copper Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Crude Oil WTI Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Brent Oil Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Natural Gas Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



US Coffee C Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Dow Jones Industrial Averag..


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Nasdaq 100


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



S&P 500


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



DAX


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



FTSE 100


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



CAC 40


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Nikkei 225


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Apple Inc


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Alphabet Inc Class A


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Bank of America Corp


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



JPMorgan Chase & Co


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Exxon Mobil Corporation


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



BP PLC


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Deutsche Bank AG NA O.N.


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



U.S. 2-Year


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



U.S. 5-Year


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



U.S. 10-Year


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



U.S. 30-Year


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Euro Bund Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



US 10 Year T-Note Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



Japan Government Bond Futur..


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



UK Gilt Futures


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



SPDR Dow Jones Industrial A..


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



iShares Russell 1000 Growth


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



iShares Russell 2000


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



PowerShares QQQ Trust Serie..


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



SPDR S&P 500


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



ProShares UltraShort S&P500


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 



ProShares UltraShort QQQ


 %



Summary




Moving Averages:
Buy 
Sell 



Indicators:
Buy 
Sell 




 
 
EUR/USD
1.1750
Strong Buy
 


 
 
GBP/USD
1.3135
Neutral
 


 
 
USD/JPY
110.69
Strong Sell
 


 
 
AUD/USD
0.7986
Strong Sell
 


 
 
USD/CAD
1.2433
Strong Buy
 


 
 
EUR/JPY
130.04
Strong Sell
 


 
 
EUR/CHF
1.1381
Strong Sell
 






 
 
Gold


 


 
 
Silver


 


 
 
Copper


 


 
 
Crude Oil WTI


 


 
 
Brent Oil


 


 
 
Natural Gas


 


 
 
US Coffee C


 






 
 
Dow 30


 


 
 
Nasdaq 100


 


 
 
S&P 500


 


 
 
DAX


 


 
 
FTSE 100


 


 
 
CAC 40


 


 
 
Nikkei 225


 






 
 
Apple


 


 
 
Alphabet A


 


 
 
Bank of America


 


 
 
JPMorgan


 


 
 
Exxon Mobil


 


 
 
BP


 


 
 
Deutsche Bank AG


 



 

Start Trading Today 
Recent Quotes NamePriceChg.Chg. %  0JPu9.440.000.00% 


Add to Watchlist
Add to Watchlist


Add to Watchlist (Max 50)

Select where to add the results:





			Added successfully		


Create Portfolio
Apply 



Create 



Close 

 



 

Market Movers


Most Active
Gainers %
Losers %







 
Name
Last
Chg. %
Vol.

 




 
MO
66.94
-9.49%
54.40M

 


 
SBUX
54.00
-9.24%
53.45M

 


 
FB
172.45
+1.18%
24.56M

 


 
AAPL
149.50
-0.70%
17.21M

 


 
BABA
157.56
+2.21%
14.45M

 


 
BIDU
220.00
+9.45%
12.59M

 


 
AMZN
1,020.04
-2.48%
7.71M

 

 





 
Name
Last
Chg. %
Vol.

 




 
BIDU
220.00
+9.45%
12.59M

 


 
FSLR
48.87
+9.06%
9.31M

 


 
MHK
248.65
+4.33%
1.20M

 


 
COL
113.73
+4.32%
2.87M

 


 
LYB
89.89
+3.88%
3.98M

 


 
HIG
54.82
+3.59%
4.66M

 


 
EXPE
159.50
+3.40%
4.40M

 

 





 
Name
Last
Chg. %
Vol.

 




 
FLS
41.30
-10.91%
6.85M

 


 
MO
66.94
-9.49%
54.40M

 


 
SBUX
54.00
-9.24%
53.45M

 


 
GT
32.51
-8.37%
18.00M

 


 
MAT
19.64
-7.82%
22.88M

 


 
WDC
84.97
-7.54%
11.20M

 


 
SCG
61.29
-6.63%
2.47M

 

 


Promotions

 
Should You Try Trading New Markets?
Nadex 

 
Webinars






Identify sell and buy market areas

Tuesday, August 1, 2017 | 01:00PM EDT 









Does your trading edge suck? Lets fix it

Thursday, August 3, 2017 | 01:00PM EDT 









Intraday indicator Pivot point (daily formula)

Tuesday, August 8, 2017 | 01:00PM EDT 









Neurolinguistics programming & trading psychology

Tuesday, August 15, 2017 | 01:00PM EDT 





   
















 

Sign up for FREE and get:
 Real-Time Alerts
 Advanced Portfolio Features
 Personalized Charts
 Fully-Synced App








Continue with Facebook



Continue with Google


or

Sign up with Email





 













Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









     JPEP | Stocks Price Quote for JP Energy Partners LP                                      
               Your browser of choice has not been tested for use with Barchart.com. If you have issues, please download one of the browsers listed here.       Market Data & B2B Solutions       Report a Bug    Give Feedback   Market:  Market:         US       Canada       UK       Australia            Financial Technology & Market Data    Market Data Feeds   OnDemand Web APIs   Website Solutions     Barchart Trader   Mobile Solutions   ISV Solutions     Content Overview   Enterprise Data Management (EDM)   Agribusiness Technology Solutions                                                      No Matching Results   Advanced search      or   Select a Commodity  Wheat Corn Soybeans Soybean Meal Soybean Oil Oats Rough Rice Hard Red Wheat Spring Wheat Canola   U.S. Dollar Index British Pound Canadian Dollar Japanese Yen Swiss Franc Euro FX Australian Dollar Mexican Peso New Zealand Dollar South African Rand Brazilian Real Russian Ruble   Crude Oil WTI ULSD NY Harbor Gasoline RBOB Natural Gas Crude Oil Brent Ethanol   T-Bond Ultra T-Bond 10 Year T-Note 5 Year T-Note 2 Year T-Note 30 Day Fed Funds Eurodollar   S&P 500 E-Mini Nasdaq 100 E-Mini Dow Indu E-Mini Russell 2000 E-Mini S&P Midcap E-Mini S&P 500 VIX S&P GSCI   Live Cattle Feeder Cattle Lean Hogs Class III Milk   Gold Silver High Grade Copper Platinum Palladium   Cotton #2 Orange Juice Coffee Sugar #11 Cocoa Lumber   ICE Crude Oil Brent ICE Crude Oil WTI ICE Gas Oil ICE Natural Gas ICE RBOB Blendstock ICE Heating Oil   Euro Bund Euro Bobl Euro Schatz Euro Buxl Euro OAT Long-Term Euro BTP Long-Term Eurex Conf Long-Term Euro Bono Long-Term 10-Year Long Gilt 3-Month EuriBor 3-Month Sterling 3-Month Euroswiss   Rapeseed Feed Wheat Milling Wheat Corn   Euro Stoxx 50 Index FTSE 100 Index DAX Index Swiss Market Index CAC 40 Index AEX Index BEL 20 PSI 20 IBEX 35-Mini OMX Swedish Index VSTOXX Mini   Steel Scrap Steel Rebar   Cocoa #7 Coffee Robusta 10-T Sugar White #5                Stocks   Stocks        Market Pulse   Market Overview   Market Momentum   Market Performance   Top 100 Stocks   Today's Price Surprises   New Highs & Lows   Economic Overview   Earnings Within 7 Days   Earnings & Dividends   Stock Screener     Performance Leaders   Percent Change   Price Change   Range Change   Gap Up & Gap Down   Five Day Gainers         Most Active   Volume Leaders   Price Volume Leaders   Volume Advances   Trading Liquidity     Indices   Major Indices   S&P Indices   S&P Sectors   DOW Indices   Nasdaq Index   Russell Indices   Volatility Indices   Commodities Indices   US Sectors Indices         Trading Signals   New Recommendations   Top Stocks to Own   Top Signal Strength   Top Signal Direction   Stock Signal Upgrades     Sectors   Major Market Sectors   Industry Rankings   Industry Performance            Futures   Futures        Market Pulse   Market Overview   Long Term Trends   Today's Price Surprises   Highs & Lows   Futures Market Map   Performance Leaders   Most Active Futures   Prices by Exchange   Commitment of Traders     Commodity Groupings   Major Commodities   Currencies   Energies   Financials   Grains   Indices   Meats   Metals   Softs         Trading Signals   New Recommendations     Resources   Contract Specifications   Futures Expirations   First Notice Dates   Options Expirations         European Futures   Long Term Trends   Today's Price Surprises   Highs & Lows   Futures Market Map   Performance Leaders   Most Active Futures     European Groupings   Major Commodities   Energies   Financials   Grains   Indices   Metals   Softs            Forex   Forex        Market Pulse   Market Overview   Long Term Trends   Today's Price Surprises   Highs & Lows   Forex Market Map   Performance Leaders         Currency Groupings   Major Cross Rates   Australian Dollar   British Pound   Canadian Dollar   Euro FX   Japanese Yen   Swiss Franc   US Dollar   Metals Rates   All Forex Markets         Trading Signals   New Recommendations     Resources   Currency Converter             Options   Options        Market Pulse   Market Overview   Unusual Options Activity   Most Active Options   Highest Implied Volatility   %Change in Volatility   Change in Open Interest   Volume Leaders         Advanced Groupings   Covered Calls   Naked Puts   Bull Call Spreads   Bear Call Spreads   Bear Put Spreads   Bull Put Spreads         Optionable Stocks   Upcoming Earnings   Stocks by Sector            ETFs & Funds   ETFs & Funds        Market Pulse   Market Overview   Major ETFs   ETFs by Asset Class   Top 100 ETFs   Today's Price Surprises   New Highs & Lows   ETFs Screener     Performance Leaders   Percent Change   Price Change   Range Change   Gap Up & Gap Down   Five Day Gainers         Most Active   Volume Leaders   Price Volume Leaders   Volume Advances     Trading Signals   New Recommendations   Top ETFs to Own   Top Signal Strength   Top Signal Direction   ETFs Signal Upgrades         Mutual Funds   Today's Price Surprises   New Highs & Lows   Performance   Price Change   Funds Screener            News   News        Market Pulse   News Overview   Top Stories   Forex News   Options News     Futures Commentary   All Sectors   Currencies   Energies   Financials   Grains   Indices   Meats   Metals   Softs         News by Sector   Aerospace   Agriculture   Business Services   Construction   Consumer Products   Corporate   Economy   Energy & Oil   Finance and Banking   Industrial Products   Leisure & Recreation   Media   Medical   Retail Sales   Technology & Computers   Transportation   Utilities         Barchart Exclusive   Van Meerten Stock Picks   Chart of the Day   Barchart Morning Call     Featured Sources   Zacks News   Brugler Ag Report            My Barchart   My Barchart   My Barchart        Tools   My Barchart   Watchlist   Portfolio   Portfolio Summary   Alerts         Manage Tools   Organize Watchlists   Organize Portfolios   Organize Screeners   Custom Views   Chart Templates     Account   My Profile   Site Preferences         Subscriptions   End-of-Day Watchlists   End-of-Day Portfolios   End-of-Day Reports   Barchart Newsletters   Barchart Premier           Premium Services        Barchart Premier    Access a cleaner, faster browsing experience of Barchart.com with tools and services exclusive to Premier Members.   Learn More      Trends in Futures    Learn how to analyze long term trends with Trader and Barchart's Chief Market Strategist, Gary Kamen.   Learn More      Barchart Trader    Trade from your desktop, tablet or phone with our real-time trading software.   Learn More      Futures Trading Education    Launch your own "Greatest Business on Earth" by following seasoned trader, Jim Prince, as he breaks down best ways to trade commodities.   Learn More                                          Menu      quotes   Overview   Performance Report     charts   Interactive Chart   Technical Chart      

                -->
    



  technicals   Technical Analysis   Trader's Cheat Sheet   Barchart Opinion   Trading Strategies   Price History     company   News   Profile   SEC Filings   Stock Comparison     analysts   Earnings Estimates   Analyst Ratings     financials   Income Statement   Cash Flow   Balance Sheet         

                -->
    



        

                -->
    


        JP Energy Partners LP (JPEP)     [[ item.lastPrice ]]  [[ item.priceChange ]]  ([[ item.percentChange ]])  [[ item.tradeTime ]]  [NYSE]    [[ item.bidPrice ]] x [[ item.bidSize ]]  [[ item.askPrice ]] x [[ item.askSize ]]    [[ session ]]  by (BATS)    [[ item.lastPrice ]]  [[ item.priceChange ]]  ([[ item.percentChange ]])  [[ item.tradeTime ]] [NYSE]    [[ item.bidPrice ]]  x [[ item.bidSize ]]  [[ item.askPrice ]]  x [[ item.askSize ]]    [[ session ]] [[ item.lastPriceExt ]]  [[ item.priceChangeExt ]] ([[ item.percentChangeExt ]])  [[ item.tradeTimeExt ]]     Quote Overview for [[ item.sessionDateDisplayLong ]]      Go To:     --Select Page--     Performance Report     Interactive Chart     Technical Chart     Technical Analysis     Trader's Cheat Sheet     Barchart Opinion     Trading Strategies     Price History     News     Profile     SEC Filings     Stock Comparison     Earnings Estimates     Analyst Ratings     Income Statement     Cash Flow     Balance Sheet          Set Alerts    Watchlist     Trade with:           [[ rowChartData.labelLow ]] [[ rowChartData.lowPriceFormatted ]] [[ rowChartData.lowPrice ]]   [[ rowChartData.labelHigh ]] [[ rowChartData.highPriceFormatted ]] [[ rowChartData.highPrice ]]      since [[ rowChartData.lowDate ]]   since [[ rowChartData.highDate ]]      [[ fieldTitles[key] ]]  [[ value ]] [[ value ]]        [[ ctrl.chartTitle ]]  Full Chart             Fundamentals See More       Market Capitalization, $K   174,923     Shares Outstanding, K   18,530     Annual Sales, $   680,590 K     Annual Income, $   -58,660 K     36-Month Beta   3.06     Price/Sales   0.69     Price/Cash Flow   N/A     Price/Book   0.38         Price/Earnings ttm  0.00    Earnings Per Share ttm  -0.83    Most Recent Earnings  -0.18 on 11/07/16    Next Earnings Date  03/06/17    Annual Dividend & Yield  1.30 (13.67%)    Most Recent Dividend  0.33 on 02/03/17    Sectors:         Price Performance See More      Period Period Low  Period High Performance     1-Month      8.75 +7.89%  on 02/28/17         9.86 -4.26%  on 02/10/17     +0.06 (+0.64%)  since 02/07/17      3-Month      8.75 +7.89%  on 02/28/17         10.58 -10.78%  on 02/01/17     -0.14 (-1.46%)  since 12/07/16      52-Week      4.56 +107.02%  on 03/08/16         10.58 -10.78%  on 02/01/17     +4.05 (+75.14%)  since 03/07/16        

                -->
    


   Most Recent Stories More News      American Midstream Partners Announces Successful Completion of Merger with JP Energy Partners   BusinessWire - Wed Mar 8, 8:09AM CST  CMTX Wed Mar 8, 8:09AM CST  American Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:AMID) ("American Midstream" or 
      "Partnership") and JP Energy Partners LP (NYSE: JPEP) ("JP Energy") 
      today announced the successful completion of the previously...     JPEP : 9.44   (-0.74%)       AMID : 14.50   (-2.68%)       JP Energy Partners LP Announces 2016 Schedule K-1 Availability   BusinessWire - Thu Mar 2, 7:00AM CST  CMTX Thu Mar 2, 7:00AM CST  JP Energy Partners LP ("JPE") (NYSE:JPEP) today announced that on March 9th 
      it will have its completed 2016 tax packages for its unitholders, 
      including Schedule K-1, available online and...     JPEP : 9.44   (-0.74%)       More news for this symbol         Barchart Technical Opinion     Weak   buy      The Barchart Technical Opinion rating is a 24% Buy with a Weakening short term outlook on maintaining the current direction.     Longer term, the trend strength is Minimum.   Long term indicators fully support a continuation of the trend.      See More      Get API Access to JPEP Quotes    

                -->
    



  Business Summary   JP Energy Partners LP owns, operates, develops and acquires a diversified portfolio of midstream energy assets. The Company's operations consist of four business segments: crude oil pipelines and storage; crude oil supply and logistics; refined products terminals and storage; NGL distribution and sales....   See More     

                -->
    



   JPEP Related stocks       Symbol   3M %Chg        JPEP     -1.46%      JP Energy Partners LP        EPD     -0.81%      Enterprise Products Partners LP        ETP     -14.04%      Energy Transfer Partners        ETE     -4.34%      Energy Transfer Equity LP        PAA     -9.33%      Plains All American Pipeline LP        MMP     -6.65%      Magellan Midstream Partners LP       Compare Symbols      Support & Resistance       2nd Resistance Point 9.80   1st Resistance Point 9.62   Last Price 9.44   1st Support Level 9.28   2nd Support Level 9.12       See More              Log In or Sign Up    Log Out      Market:  Market:         US       Canada       UK       Australia       HOME    Stocks   Market Pulse  Market Overview Market Momentum Market Performance Top 100 Stocks Today's Price Surprises New Highs & Lows Economic Overview Earnings Within 7 Days Earnings & Dividends Stock Screener    Performance Leaders  Percent Change Price Change Range Change Gap Up & Gap Down Five Day Gainers    Most Active  Volume Leaders Price Volume Leaders Volume Advances Trading Liquidity    Indices  Major Indices S&P Indices S&P Sectors DOW Indices Nasdaq Index Russell Indices Volatility Indices Commodities Indices US Sectors Indices    Trading Signals  New Recommendations Top Stocks to Own Top Signal Strength Top Signal Direction Stock Signal Upgrades    Sectors  Major Market Sectors Industry Rankings Industry Performance      Futures   Market Pulse  Market Overview Long Term Trends Today's Price Surprises Highs & Lows Futures Market Map Performance Leaders Most Active Futures Prices by Exchange Commitment of Traders    Commodity Groupings  Major Commodities Currencies Energies Financials Grains Indices Meats Metals Softs    Trading Signals  New Recommendations    Resources  Contract Specifications Futures Expirations First Notice Dates Options Expirations    European Futures  Long Term Trends Today's Price Surprises Highs & Lows Futures Market Map Performance Leaders Most Active Futures    European Groupings  Major Commodities Energies Financials Grains Indices Metals Softs      Forex   Market Pulse  Market Overview Long Term Trends Today's Price Surprises Highs & Lows Forex Market Map Performance Leaders    Currency Groupings  Major Cross Rates Australian Dollar British Pound Canadian Dollar Euro FX Japanese Yen Swiss Franc US Dollar Metals Rates All Forex Markets    Trading Signals  New Recommendations    Resources  Currency Converter       Options   Market Pulse  Market Overview Unusual Options Activity Most Active Options Highest Implied Volatility %Change in Volatility Change in Open Interest Volume Leaders    Advanced Groupings  Covered Calls Naked Puts Bull Call Spreads Bear Call Spreads Bear Put Spreads Bull Put Spreads    Optionable Stocks  Upcoming Earnings Stocks by Sector      ETFs & Funds   Market Pulse  Market Overview Major ETFs ETFs by Asset Class Top 100 ETFs Today's Price Surprises New Highs & Lows ETFs Screener    Performance Leaders  Percent Change Price Change Range Change Gap Up & Gap Down Five Day Gainers    Most Active  Volume Leaders Price Volume Leaders Volume Advances    Trading Signals  New Recommendations Top ETFs to Own Top Signal Strength Top Signal Direction ETFs Signal Upgrades    Mutual Funds  Today's Price Surprises New Highs & Lows Performance Price Change Funds Screener      News   Market Pulse  News Overview Top Stories Forex News Options News    Futures Commentary  All Sectors Currencies Energies Financials Grains Indices Meats Metals Softs    News by Sector  Aerospace Agriculture Business Services Construction Consumer Products Corporate Economy Energy & Oil Finance and Banking Industrial Products Leisure & Recreation Media Medical Retail Sales Technology & Computers Transportation Utilities    Barchart Exclusive  Van Meerten Stock Picks Chart of the Day Barchart Morning Call    Featured Sources  Zacks News Brugler Ag Report      My Barchart   Tools  My Barchart Watchlist Portfolio Portfolio Summary Alerts    Manage Tools  Organize Watchlists Organize Portfolios Organize Screeners Custom Views Chart Templates    Account  My Profile Site Preferences    Subscriptions  End-of-Day Watchlists End-of-Day Portfolios End-of-Day Reports Barchart Newsletters Barchart Premier      B2B SOLUTIONS   Market Data Feeds OnDemand Web APIs Website Solutions Barchart Trader Mobile Solutions ISV Solutions Enterprise Data Management (EDM) Agribusiness Technology Solutions        Report a Bug      Give Feedback          Quote Overview        The Quote Overview page gives you a snapshot view for a specific symbol. Real-time prices are provided by Bats Exchange on individual U.S. equities quote pages. During market hours, the real-time Bats price displays and new trade updates are updated on the page (as indicated by a "flash"). Volume always reflects consolidated markets. If the symbol has pre-market or post-market trades, that information will also be reflected along with the last (closing) price from the symbol's exchange. Real-time prices are available during market hours (9:30 AM to 4:00 PM EST).  Note: The Bats Exchange currently accounts for approximately 11-12% of all U.S. equity trading each day. As a result, the real-time prices displayed may have minor discrepancies when comparing the information with other sites offering real-time data, or with brokerage firms. If you require comprehensive real-time bids/asks/quotes, we offer a no-risk trial to one of our real-time products. Summary Quoteboard The Summary Quoteboard displays snapshot quote data. When available, Bid and Ask information from the Bats exchange is updated as new data is received. Volume is also updated but is the delayed consolidated Volume from the symbol's exchange. Quoteboard data fields include:  Day High / Low: The highest and lowest trade price for the current trading session. Open: The opening price for the current trading session is plotted on the day's High/Low histogram. Previous Close: The closing price from the previous trading session. Bid: The last bid price and bid size. Ask: The last ask price and ask size. Volume: The total number of shares or contracts traded in the current trading session. Average Volume: The average number of shares traded over the last 20 days. Weighted Alpha: A measure of how much a stock or commodity has risen or fallen over a one-year period. Barchart takes this Alpha and weights this, assigning more weight to recent activity, and less (0.5 factor) to activity at the beginning of the period. Thus, Weighted Alpha is a measure of one-year growth with an emphasis on the most recent price activity.  Chart Snapshot A thumbnail of a daily chart is provided, with a link to open and customize a full-sized chart.Barchart Technical Opinion The Barchart Technical Opinion widget shows you today's overally Barchart Opinion with general information on how to interpret the short and longer term signals. Unique to Barchart.com, Opinions analyzes a stock or commodity using 13 popular analytics in short-, medium- and long-term periods. Results are interpreted as buy, sell or hold signals, each with numeric ratings and summarized with an overall percentage buy or sell rating. After each calculation the program assigns a Buy, Sell, or Hold value with the study, depending on where the price lies in reference to the common interpretation of the study. For example, a price above its moving average is generally considered an upward trend or a buy. A symbol will be given one of the following overall ratings:  Strong Buy (greater than "66% Buy") Buy (greater than or equal to "33% Buy" and less than or equal to "66% Buy") Weak Buy ("0% Buy" through "33% Buy") Hold Strong Sell (greater than "66% Sell") Sell (greater than or equal to "33% Sell" and less than or equal to "66% Sell") Weak Sell ("0% Sell" through "33% Sell")  The current reading of the 14-Day Stochastic indicator is also factored into the interpretation. The following information will appear when the following conditions are met:   If the 14-Day Stochastic %K is greater than 90 and the Overall Opinion is a Buy, the following displays: "The market is in highly overbought territory. Beware of a trend reversal." If the 14-Day Stochastic %K is greater than 80 and the Overall Opinion is a Buy, the following displays: "The market is approaching overbought territory. Be watchful of a trend reversal."  If the 14-Day Stochastic %K is less than 10 and the Overall Opinion is a Sell, the following displays: "The market is in highly oversold territory. Beware of a trend reversal."  If the 14-Day Stochastic %K is less than 20 and the Overall Opinion is a Sell, the following displays: "The market is approaching oversold territory. Be watchful of a trend reversal." Business Summary Provides a general description of the business conducted by this company. Price Performance This section shows the Highs and Lows over the past 1, 3 and 12-Month periods. Click the "See More" link to see the full Performance Report page with expanded historical information.Fundamentals For US Stocks, the Overview page includes key statistics on the stock's fundamentals, with a link to see more. Most Recent Earnings figures are based on Non-GAAP income from continuing operations. Market Cap: capitalization or market value of a stock is simply the market value of all outstanding shares. It is computed by multiplying the market price by the number of outstanding shares. For example, a publicly held company with 10 million shares outstanding that trade at $10 each would have a market capitalization of $100 million. Shares Outstanding: Common shares outstanding as reported by the company on the 10-Q or 10-K. P/E Ratio: Latest closing price divided by the earnings-per-share based on the Latest 12-Month EPS Change (LTM) of earnings. Companies with negative earnings receive an "NE." EPS: The basic annual EPS from total operations is the bottom line income after all expenses, divided by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding. For example, if a company has $10 million in net income and 10 million in outstanding shares, then its EPS is $1. Beta: 36 Month Beta: Coefficient that measures the volatility of a stock's returns relative to the market (S&P 500). It is based on a 36-month historical regression of the return on the stock onto the return on the S&P 500. Earnings: The amount of latest Earnings Per Share (EPS) paid out to shareholders. Dividend Yield: A portion of a company's profit paid to shareholders, quoted as the dollar amount each share receives (dividends per share). Yield is the amount of dividends paid per share, divided by the closing price. Sectors: Links to the Industry Groups and/or SIC codes in which the stock is found.Support and Resistance This section shows a snapshot view of the Trader's Cheat Sheet with the Last Price, and four separate pivot points (2 Support Levels, and 2 Resistance Points). The Last Price shown is the last trade price at the time the quote page was displayed, and will not update every 10 seconds (as the Last Price at the top of the Quote page does). The Last Price will update only when the page is refreshed. Pivot points are used to identify intraday support, resistance and target levels. The pivot point and its support and resistance pairs are defined as follows, where H, L, C are the current day's high, low and close, respectively. Support and Resistance points are based on end-of-day prices and are intended for the current trading session if the market is open, or the next trading session if the market is closed.   Pivot Point: (P) = (H + L + C) / 3 First Resistance Level: (R1) = (2 * P) - L First Support Level: (S1) = (2 * P) - H Second Resistance Level: (R2) = P + (R1 - S1) Second Support Level: (S2) = P - (R1 - S1) Related Stocks For comparison purposes, find information on other symbols contained in the same sector.Most Recent Stories View the latest top stories from the Associated Press or Canadian Press (based on your Market selection). Recent Commentary - Twitter See what others are saying about this symbol on selected Financial Twitter feeds.                                 Add Data Columns to this Table Learn about our Custom Views   Want to use this as  your default charts setting? Learn about our Custom Templates   Switch the Market flag above for targeted data. Open the menu and switch the  Market flag for targeted data.    






















JP Energy Partners LP Announces Record Date and Meeting Date for Special Meeting for Proposed Merger with American Midstream Partners, LPHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballJP Energy Partners LP Announces Record Date and Meeting Date for Special Meeting for Proposed Merger with American Midstream Partners, LPBusiness WireJanuary 20, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareIRVING, Texas--(BUSINESS WIRE)--JP Energy Partners LP (JPEP) (“JP Energy” or “our”) today announced that it has established a record date of January 30, 2017, and a meeting date of March 7, 2017, for a special meeting of its unitholders. At the special meeting, which will be held at 11 a.m. central standard time at the Hyatt Regency Downtown Houston, 1200 Louisiana Street, Houston, TX, 77002, 2nd Floor Arboretum Conference Room, JP Energy unitholders will vote on the previously announced proposed merger (the “Merger”) of JP Energy and American Midstream Partners, LP (AMID) (“AMID”), and related matters pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of October 23, 2016 (the “Merger Agreement”), by and among JP Energy, AMID, their respective general partners, and certain wholly owned subsidiaries of AMID.JP Energy unitholders of record at the close of business on January 30, 2017, will be entitled to receive notice of the special meeting and to vote at the special meeting. Subject to satisfaction of the remaining closing conditions, including receipt of JP Energy unitholder approval, the parties currently expect to complete the Merger shortly following conclusion of the special meeting.About JP Energy Partners LPJP Energy Partners LP is a publicly traded, growth-oriented limited partnership that owns, operates, develops and acquires a diversified portfolio of midstream energy assets. Our operations currently consist of: (i) crude oil pipelines and storage; (ii) refined products terminals and storage; and (iii) NGL distribution and sales, which together provide midstream infrastructure solutions for the growing supply of crude oil, refined products and NGLs in the United States. To learn more, please visit our website at www.jpenergypartners.com.Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking StatementsThis release includes “forward-looking” statements. Forward-looking statements are identified as any statement that does not relate strictly to historical or current facts. Statements using words such as “expect,” “will” or similar expressions help identify forward-looking statements. JP Energy cannot give any assurance that expectations and projections about future events will prove to be correct. Forward-looking statements are subject to a variety of risks, uncertainties and assumptions. These risks and uncertainties include the risks that the proposed transaction may not be consummated or the benefits contemplated therefrom may not be realized. Actual results and outcomes may differ materially from those expressed in such forward-looking statements. These and other risks and uncertainties are discussed in more detail in filings made by JP Energy with the SEC, which are available for free at www.sec.gov. JP Energy undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.Additional Information and Where to Find ItThis communication does not constitute an offer to buy or sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy or sell any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval with respect to the Merger. This communication relates to a proposed business combination between AMID and JP Energy. In connection with the proposed transaction, AMID filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) a registration statement on Form S-4 containing a preliminary joint proxy statement/prospectus of AMID and JP Energy. The registration statement has not yet become effective. After the registration statement is declared effective by the SEC, AMID and JP Energy will each file with the SEC a definitive proxy statement/prospectus, and each of AMID and JP Energy will file other documents with respect to the proposed transaction and a definitive proxy statement/prospectus will be mailed to unitholders of JP Energy. WE URGE INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS, THE REGISTRATION STATEMENT AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT DOCUMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN FILED OR MAY BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN OR WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Any definitive proxy statement(s) (if and when available) will be mailed to unitholders of JP Energy. Investors and security holders will be able to obtain these materials (if and when they are available) free of charge at the SEC’s website, www.sec.gov. In addition, copies of any documents filed with the SEC may be obtained free of charge from JP Energy’s internet website for investors at http://ir.jpenergypartners.com, and from AMID’s investor relations website at http://www.americanmidstream.com/investor-relations. Investors and security holders may also read and copy any reports, statements and other information filed by AMID and JP Energy with the SEC at the SEC public reference room at 100 F Street, N.E., Washington, D.C. 20549. Please call the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330 or visit the SEC’s website for further information on its public reference room.Read MoreParticipation in the Solicitation of VotesAMID and JP Energy and their respective directors and executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information regarding JP Energy's directors and executive officers is available in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015, filed with the SEC on February 29, 2016. Information regarding AMID’s directors and executive officers is available in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015, which was filed with the SEC on March 7, 2016. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitation and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, will be contained in the proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials to be filed with the SEC when they become available.View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20170120005122/en/ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextAnthony Scaramucci's wife reportedly filed for divorce because he was 'hell-bent' on joining TrumpBusiness InsiderEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekWells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncoveredReutersThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinanceThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredTrump to cops: 'Please don't be too nice' while arresting 'thugs,' and don't worry about their heads when you toss them in the 'paddy wagon'Business InsiderMy bullish view on stocks hasn't changed one iota: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoBlue Apron: Bullish calls not all they're cooked up to beEnter A Name, Wait 10 Seconds, Brace YourselfTruth FinderSponsoredAPNewsBreak: Yellowstone park cracks down on sex harassmentAssociated PressMainstream Model 3 holds promise _ and peril _ for TeslaAssociated PressNorth Korea says 2nd ICBM test puts 'entire' US in rangeJohn: Doesn't that little fat kid know that if he actually fires a missile at something other than water, his country will just be annihilated?Join the Conversation1 / 55.3k



















JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP (JPEP) IPO - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP (JPEP) IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP


Company Address
600 EAST LAS COLINAS BLVD.SUITE 2000IRVING, TX 75039


Company Phone
972-444-0300


Company Website
www.jpenergypartners.com


CEO
J. Patrick Barley


Employees  (as of 9/22/2014) 
0


State of Inc
DE


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Priced (10/2/2014)


Proposed Symbol
JPEP


Exchange
New York Stock Exchange


Share Price
$20.00


Shares Offered
13,750,000


Offer Amount
$275,000,000.00


Total Expenses
$4,000,000.00


Shares Over Alloted
0


Shareholder Shares Offered
 -- 


Shares Outstanding
18,213,502


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
3/31/2015


Quiet Period Expiration
11/11/2014


CIK
0001523404




We expect to receive net proceeds of approximately $257.1 million from the
sale of      common units in this offering, after deducting underwriting
discounts and structuring fees but before estimated offering expenses. We intend
to use these net proceeds as follows:

        º pay estimated offering expenses of approximately $2.0 million;

        º redeem 100% of our issued and outstanding Series D preferred units for
          approximately $42.4 million;

        º repay $195.6 million of the debt outstanding under our revolving
          credit facility; and

        º replenish approximately $17.1 million of working capital.

As of August 31, 2014, we had approximately $195.6 million of debt
outstanding under our revolving credit facility. Borrowings under our revolving
credit facility bear interest at 3.62% and are due on February 19, 2019. Our
outstanding indebtedness was incurred to primarily fund third party acquisitions
and for general partnership purposes.

Immediately following the repayment of a portion of the outstanding debt
under our revolving credit facility with a portion of the net proceeds from this
offering, we will borrow approximately $75.0 million thereunder. We will use the
proceeds from that borrowing to replenish our working capital.

Prior to the closing of this offering, we will distribute approximately
$92.1 million of accounts receivable that comprise our gross working capital to
our existing partners, pro rata in accordance with their ownership interest in
us.

The net proceeds from any exercise by the underwriters of their option to
purchase additional common units will be used to redeem a number of common units
from our existing partners, pro rata, equal to the number of common units issued
upon exercise of the option at a price per common unit equal to the net proceeds
per common unit in this offering before expenses but after deducting
underwriting discounts and the structuring fee. Accordingly, any exercise of the
underwriters' option will not affect the total number of units outstanding or
the amount of cash needed to pay the minimum quarterly distribution on all
units.

Affiliates of Barclays Capital Inc., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
Incorporated, RBC Capital Markets, LLC, Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc. and BMO
Capital Markets Corp. are lenders under our revolving credit facility and,
accordingly, will receive a portion of the net proceeds of this offering. The
underwriters may, from time to time, engage in transactions with and perform
services for us and our affiliates in the ordinary course of business.


Crude oil pipelines and storage. We are subject to competition from other
crude oil pipelines, crude oil storage tank operators and crude oil marketing
companies that may be able to transport or store crude oil at more favorable
prices or transport crude oil greater distance or to more favorable markets. We
compete with national, regional and local crude oil pipeline transportation and
storage companies, including the major integrated oil companies, of widely
varying sizes, financial resources and experience. Our competitors in our crude
oil storage segment include Plains All American Pipeline, L.P., Occidental
Petroleum Corporation, SemGroup Corporation, Rose Rock Midstream, L.P.,
Blueknight Energy Partners, L.P. and Enterprise Products Partners L.P.

Crude oil supply and logistics. We are subject to competition from other
providers of crude oil supply and logistics services that may be able to supply
our customers with the same or comparable services on a more competitive basis.
We compete with national, regional and local storage, gathering, transportation
and pipeline companies, including the major integrated oil companies, of widely
varying sizes, financial resources and experience. Our competitors in this
segment include Plains All American Pipeline, L.P., Rose Rock Midstream, L.P.,
Blueknight Energy Partners, L.P., SemGroup Corporation, Sunoco Logistics,
Enterprise Products Partners L.P., Genesis Energy, L.P. and NGL Energy Partners
L.P.

Refined products terminals and storage. Our refined products terminals
located in North Little Rock, Arkansas and Caddo Mills, Texas compete with other
independent terminals on price, versatility and services provided. The
competition primarily comes from integrated petroleum companies, refining and
marketing companies, independent terminal companies and distribution companies
with marketing and trading activities. In the North Little Rock, Arkansas
market, these competitors include Magellan Midstream Partners LP and HWRT Oil
Company, LLC. In Dallas, Texas, the market served by our Caddo Mills, Texas
terminal, these competitors include Valero Energy Corporation, Delek Logistics
Partners, LP, Magellan Midstream Partners LP and Flint Hills Resources LP.

NGL distribution and sales. In addition to competing with suppliers of
other energy sources such as natural gas, our NGL distribution and sales segment
competes with other retail propane distributors. The retail propane industry is
highly fragmented and competition generally occurs on a local basis with other
large full-service multi-state propane marketers, thousands of smaller local
independent marketers and farm cooperatives. The large, full-service multi-state
marketers we compete with include Ferrellgas, L.P. and AmeriGas Partners, L.P.
Each of our customer service centers operates in its own competitive environment
because retail marketers tend to be located in close proximity to customers in
order to lower the cost of providing service. Our typical customer service
center has an effective marketing radius of approximately 50 miles, although in
certain areas the marketing radius may be extended by one or more satellite
offices. Most of our customer service centers compete with five or more
marketers or distributors.


Company Description
We are a growth-oriented limited partnership formed in May 2010 by members
of management and further capitalized in June 2011 by ArcLight to own, operate,
develop and acquire a diversified portfolio of midstream energy assets. Our
operations currently consist of four business segments: (i) crude


 oil pipelines
and storage, (ii) crude oil supply and logistics, (iii) refined products
terminals and storage and (iv) NGL distribution and sales. Together our
businesses provide midstream infrastructure solutions for the growing supply of
crude oil, refined products and NGLs in the United States. Since our formation,
our primary business strategy has been to focus on:

. owning, operating and developing midstream assets serving areas experiencing 
  dramatic increases in drilling activity and production growth, as well as 
  serving key crude oil, refined product and NGL distribution hubs; 

. providing midstream infrastructure solutions to users of liquid petroleum 
  products in order to capitalize on changing product flows between producing 
  and consuming markets resulting from the significant growth in hydrocarbon 
  production across the United States; and

. operating one of the largest portable propane cylinder exchange businesses in
  the United States and capitalizing on the increase in demand and extended 
  applications for portable propane cylinders.

We intend to continue to expand our business by acquiring and constructing
additional midstream infrastructure assets and by increasing the utilization of
our existing assets to gather, transport, store and distribute crude oil,
refined products and NGLs. Our crude oil businesses are situated in high-growth
areas, including the Permian Basin, Mid-Continent and Eagle Ford shale, and
provide us with a footprint to increase our volumes as these areas experience
further drilling and production growth. In addition, we believe we have a
competitive advantage with regard to the sourcing of opportunities to build, own
and operate additional crude oil pipelines due to the insights in the market
that we obtain while providing services to customers in our crude oil supply and
logistics segment. We believe that our NGL distribution and sales segment will
continue to grow due to our recent expansion into new geographic markets, an 
increased market presence in our existing areas of operation and the increase 
in industrial and commercial applications for NGLs such as in oilfield and 
agricultural services. 

Since our formation and the formation of our affiliate, JP Energy Development 
LP ("JP Development"), in July 2012, our management team has successfully 
established a strategic midstream platform through us and JPDevelopment by way
of 25 third-party acquisitions and numerous organic capital projects.
---

Our principal executive offices are located at 600 East Las Colinas Boulevard, 
Suite 2000, Irving, Texas 75039, and our telephone number is (972) 444-0300. 
Our website is located at www.jpenergypartners.com.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
$865,817,000


Net Income
-$28,792,000


Total Assets
$842,472,000






Total Liabilities
$336,966,000


Stockholders' Equity
$505,506,000


View all Company Financials for JPEP


Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 5 Total: 5
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP
424B4
10/2/2014
Filing



JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP
S-1/A
9/22/2014
Filing



JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP
S-1/A
9/9/2014
Filing



JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP
S-1/A
7/3/2014
Filing



JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP
S-1
5/8/2014
Filing



View all SEC Filings for JPEP




Experts


Auditor
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP


Company Counsel
Latham & Watkins LLP


Lead Underwriter
Barclays Capital Inc


Lead Underwriter
BofA Merrill Lynch


Lead Underwriter
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc


Transfer Agent
American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC


Transfer Agent
 -- 


Underwriter
BMO Capital Markets Corp


Underwriter
BofA Merrill Lynch


Underwriter
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc


Underwriter
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.


Underwriter
Janney Montgomery Scott LLC


Underwriter
RBC Capital Markets, LLC


Underwriter
Robert W. Baird & Co. Incorporated


Underwriter
Simmons and Co. International


Underwriter
Stephens Inc


Underwriter
Stephens Inc.


Underwriter Counsel
Andrews Kurth LLP









News for JPEP









                        The 12% Yielding American Midstream Partners Bargain
                    

5/17/2017 4:45:00 AM - Seeking Alpha



                        JP Energy Partners LP (JPEP) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for February 03, 2017
                    

2/2/2017 10:00:03 AM - NASDAQ.com News



                        AT&T Deal Is Just The Beginning
                    

2/1/2017 1:03:00 PM - Seeking Alpha



                        Verizon Plots Next Big Move
                    

1/30/2017 2:41:00 PM - Seeking Alpha



                        MLPs: Beginning To Look A Lot Like Christmas
                    

12/18/2016 10:59:00 PM - Seeking Alpha



                        American Midstream Partners Clears Some Major Progress Hurdles
                    

12/12/2016 12:07:00 PM - Seeking Alpha



                        Energy Sector Update for 12/07/2016: AMID,JPEP,CHK,PES
                    

12/7/2016 4:34:04 PM - MT Newswires



                        JP Energy Partners (JPEP) Catches Eye: Stock Jumps 7.5%
                    

12/7/2016 9:40:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        Energy Sector Update for 10/24/2016: JPEP,AMID,MNGA,BAS
                    

10/24/2016 12:38:14 PM - MT Newswires



                        Energy Sector Update for 08/09/2016: JPEP,REN,PSXP
                    

8/9/2016 3:25:27 PM - MT Newswires



                        JP Energy Partners LP (JPEP) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for August 03, 2016
                    

8/2/2016 9:00:03 AM - NASDAQ.com News



                        JP Energy (JPEP) Worth Watching: Stock Rises 5.7% in Session
                    

8/1/2016 8:35:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        Catching Energy Stocks on the Rebound: EPE, JPEP, GNE
                    

6/8/2016 6:00:32 AM - InvestorPlace Media



                        NuStar Energy's (NS) Beats on Q1 Earnings, Misses Revenues
                    

5/3/2016 9:54:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        JP Energy Partners LP (JPEP) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for May 04, 2016
                    

5/3/2016 9:00:04 AM - NASDAQ.com News



                        Enterprise Product Partners (EPD) Q1 Earnings Top, Up Y/Y
                    

5/2/2016 10:28:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        Can the Rally in JP Energy Partners (JPEP) Shares Continue?
                    

4/29/2016 8:47:00 AM - Zacks.com



                        Oil Price Resilience Fuels Another Big Energy Stock Rally This Week (ETE, AMID, JPEP, CCLP, XCO)
                    

4/23/2016 10:25:03 AM - Motley Fool



                        Energy Sector Update for 02/16/2016: RRMS,JPEP,ORIG,TOT
                    

2/16/2016 4:48:10 PM - MT Newswires



                        Energy Sector Update for 02/16/2016: BRS,JPEP,ORIG,TOT
                    

2/16/2016 1:57:29 PM - MT Newswires




 Subscribe


                More JPEP News & Commentary



                Read JPEP Press Releases

















Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Sprint proposes merger with Charter Communications - WSJ
                        



	                     7:53PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX





































